src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-tenevasjTS_gt-norm.yaml
     теневась+V+TV+Aud+Aor+PxDu1: [теневавониʼ, теневаванониʼ]
     теневась+V+TV+Aud+Aor+PxDu2: [теневавондиʼ, теневаванондиʼ]
     теневась+V+TV+Aud+Aor+PxDu3: [теневавондиʼ, теневаванондиʼ]
     теневась+V+TV+Aud+Aor+PxPl1: [теневавонаˮ, теневаванонаˮ]
     теневась+V+TV+Aud+Aor+PxPl2: [теневавондаˮ, теневаванондаˮ]
     теневась+V+TV+Aud+Aor+PxPl3: [теневавондоʼ, теневаванондоʼ]
     теневась+V+TV+Aud+Aor+PxSg1: [теневавон, теневаванон]
     теневась+V+TV+Aud+Aor+PxSg2: [теневавонд, теневаванонд]
     теневась+V+TV+Aud+Aor+PxSg3: [теневавонда, теневаванонда]
     теневась+V+TV+Aud+Prt1+PxDu1: [теневавонинзь, теневаванонинзь]
     теневась+V+TV+Aud+Prt1+PxDu2: [теневавондинзь, теневаванондинзь]
     теневась+V+TV+Aud+Prt1+PxDu3: [теневавондинзь, теневаванондинзь]
     теневась+V+TV+Aud+Prt1+PxPl1: [теневавонаць, теневаванонаць]
     теневась+V+TV+Aud+Prt1+PxPl2: [теневавондаць, теневаванондаць]
     теневась+V+TV+Aud+Prt1+PxPl3: [теневавондонзь, теневаванондонзь]
     теневась+V+TV+Aud+Prt1+PxSg1: [теневавонась, теневаванонась]
     теневась+V+TV+Aud+Prt1+PxSg2: [теневавондась, теневаванондась]
     теневась+V+TV+Aud+Prt1+PxSg3: [теневавондась, теневаванондась]
     теневась+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScDu1+OcDu3: теневаихиюниʼ
     теневась+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScDu1+OcPl3: теневаиниʼ
     теневась+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScDu1+OcSg3: теневаимиʼ
     теневась+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScDu1: теневаиниʼ
     теневась+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScDu2+OcDu3: теневаихиюдиʼ
     теневась+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScDu2+OcPl3: теневаидиʼ
     теневась+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScDu2+OcSg3: теневаириʼ
     теневась+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScDu2: теневаидиʼ
     теневась+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScDu3+OcDu3: теневаихиюдиʼ
     теневась+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScDu3+OcPl3: теневаидиʼ
     теневась+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScDu3+OcSg3: теневаидиʼ
     теневась+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScDu3: теневаихиʼ
     теневась+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScPl1+OcDu3: теневаихиюнаˮ
     теневась+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScPl1+OcPl3: теневаинаˮ
     теневась+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScPl1+OcSg3: теневаиваˮ
     теневась+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScPl1: теневаиваˮ
     теневась+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScPl2+OcDu3: теневаихиюдаˮ
     теневась+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScPl2+OcPl3: теневаидаˮ
     теневась+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScPl2+OcSg3: теневаираˮ
     теневась+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScPl2: теневаидаˮ
     теневась+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScPl3+OcDu3: теневаихиюдоʼ
     теневась+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScPl3+OcPl3: теневаидоʼ
     теневась+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScPl3+OcSg3: теневаидоʼ
     теневась+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScPl3: теневаиˮ
     теневась+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScSg1+OcDu3: теневаихиюн
     теневась+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScSg1+OcPl3: теневаин
     теневась+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScSg1+OcSg3: теневаив
     теневась+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScSg1: теневаидмʼ
     теневась+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScSg2+OcDu3: теневаихиюд
     теневась+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScSg2+OcPl3: теневаид
     теневась+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScSg2+OcSg3: теневаир
     теневась+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScSg2: теневаин
     теневась+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScSg3+OcDu3: теневаихиюда
     теневась+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScSg3+OcPl3: теневаида
     теневась+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScSg3+OcSg3: теневаида
     теневась+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScSg3: теневаи
     теневась+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScDu1+OcDu3: теневаихиюнинзь
     теневась+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScDu1+OcPl3: теневаининзь
     теневась+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScDu1+OcSg3: теневаиминзь
     теневась+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScDu1: теневаининзь
     теневась+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScDu2+OcDu3: теневаихиюдинзь
     теневась+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScDu2+OcPl3: теневаидинзь
     теневась+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScDu2+OcSg3: теневаиринзь
     теневась+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScDu2: теневаидинзь
     теневась+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScDu3+OcDu3: теневаихиюдинзь
     теневась+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScDu3+OcPl3: теневаидинзь
     теневась+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScDu3+OcSg3: теневаидинзь
     теневась+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScDu3: теневаихинзь
     теневась+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScPl1+OcDu3: теневаихиюнаць
     теневась+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScPl1+OcPl3: теневаинаць
     теневась+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScPl1+OcSg3: теневаиваць
     теневась+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScPl1: теневаиваць
     теневась+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScPl2+OcDu3: теневаихиюдаць
     теневась+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScPl2+OcPl3: теневаидаць
     теневась+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScPl2+OcSg3: теневаираць
     теневась+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScPl2: теневаидаць
     теневась+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScPl3+OcDu3: теневаихиюдонзь
     теневась+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScPl3+OcPl3: теневаидонзь
     теневась+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScPl3+OcSg3: теневаидонзь
     теневась+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScPl3: теневаиць
     теневась+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScSg1+OcDu3: теневаихиюнась
     теневась+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScSg1+OcPl3: теневаинась
     теневась+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScSg1+OcSg3: теневаивась
     теневась+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScSg1: теневаидамзь
     теневась+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScSg2+OcDu3: теневаихиюдась
     теневась+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScSg2+OcPl3: теневаидась
     теневась+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScSg2+OcSg3: теневаирась
     теневась+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScSg2: теневаинась
     теневась+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScSg3+OcDu3: теневаихиюдась
     теневась+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScSg3+OcPl3: теневаидась
     теневась+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScSg3+OcSg3: теневаидась
     теневась+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScSg3: теневаись
     теневась+V+TV+ConNeg: теневˮ
     теневась+V+TV+Evas+Abs: теневавоӈгад
     теневась+V+TV+Evas+PxDu1: [теневавоӈгаданиʼ, теневавоӈгадниʼ]
     теневась+V+TV+Evas+PxDu2: теневавоӈгадандиʼ
     теневась+V+TV+Evas+PxDu3: теневавоӈгадандиʼ
     теневась+V+TV+Evas+PxPl1: [теневавоӈгаданаˮ, теневавоӈгаднаˮ]
     теневась+V+TV+Evas+PxPl2: теневавоӈгадандаˮ
     теневась+V+TV+Evas+PxPl3: теневавоӈгадандоʼ
#     теневась+V+TV+Evas+PxSg1.2: [теневавоӈгадани, теневавоӈгадни]
     теневась+V+TV+Evas+PxSg1: [теневавоӈгадан, теневавоӈгадани, теневавоӈгадни]
     теневась+V+TV+Evas+PxSg2: теневавоӈгаданд
     теневась+V+TV+Evas+PxSg3: теневавоӈгаданда
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+ConNeg: теневаӈгуˮ
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScDu1+OcDu3: теневаӈгухуюниʼ
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScDu1+OcPl3: теневаӈгуниʼ
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScDu1+OcSg3: теневаӈгумиʼ
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScDu1: теневаӈгуниʼ
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScDu2+OcDu3: теневаӈгухуюдиʼ
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScDu2+OcPl3: теневаӈгудиʼ
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScDu2+OcSg3: теневаӈгуриʼ
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScDu2: теневаӈгудиʼ
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScDu3+OcDu3: теневаӈгухуюдиʼ
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScDu3+OcPl3: теневаӈгудиʼ
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScDu3+OcSg3: теневаӈгудиʼ
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: теневаӈгухуʼ
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScPl1+OcDu3: теневаӈгухуюнаˮ
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScPl1+OcPl3: теневаӈгунаˮ
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScPl1+OcSg3: теневаӈгуваˮ
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScPl1: теневаӈгуваˮ
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScPl2+OcDu3: теневаӈгухуюдаˮ
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScPl2+OcPl3: теневаӈгудаˮ
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScPl2+OcSg3: теневаӈгураˮ
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScPl2: теневаӈгудаˮ
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScPl3+OcDu3: теневаӈгухуюдоʼ
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScPl3+OcPl3: теневаӈгудоʼ
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScPl3+OcSg3: теневаӈгудоʼ
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: теневаӈгуˮ
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScSg1+OcDu3: теневаӈгухуюн
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScSg1+OcPl3: теневаӈгун
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScSg1+OcSg3: теневаӈгув
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScSg1: теневаӈгудмʼ
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScSg2+OcDu3: теневаӈгухуюд
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScSg2+OcPl3: теневаӈгуд
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScSg2+OcSg3: теневаӈгур
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScSg2: теневаӈгун
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScSg3+OcDu3: теневаӈгухуюда
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScSg3+OcPl3: теневаӈгуда
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScSg3+OcSg3: теневаӈгуда
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: теневаӈгу
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScDu1+OcDu3: теневаӈгухуюнинзь
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScDu1+OcPl3: теневаӈгунинзь
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScDu1+OcSg3: теневаӈгуминзь
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScDu1: теневаӈгунинзь
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScDu2+OcDu3: теневаӈгухуюдинзь
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScDu2+OcPl3: теневаӈгудинзь
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScDu2+OcSg3: теневаӈгуринзь
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScDu2: теневаӈгудинзь
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3+OcDu3: теневаӈгухуюдинзь
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3+OcPl3: теневаӈгудинзь
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3+OcSg3: теневаӈгудинзь
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: теневаӈгухунзь
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1+OcDu3: теневаӈгухуюнаць
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1+OcPl3: теневаӈгунаць
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1+OcSg3: теневаӈгуваць
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1: теневаӈгуваць
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2+OcDu3: теневаӈгухуюдаць
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2+OcPl3: теневаӈгудаць
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2+OcSg3: теневаӈгураць
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2: теневаӈгудаць
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3+OcDu3: теневаӈгухуюдонзь
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3+OcPl3: теневаӈгудонзь
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3+OcSg3: теневаӈгудонзь
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: теневаӈгуць
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1+OcDu3: теневаӈгухуюнась
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1+OcPl3: теневаӈгунась
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1+OcSg3: теневаӈгувась
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1: теневаӈгудамзь
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2+OcDu3: теневаӈгухуюдась
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2+OcPl3: теневаӈгудась
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2+OcSg3: теневаӈгурась
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2: теневаӈгунась
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3+OcDu3: теневаӈгухуюдась
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3+OcPl3: теневаӈгудась
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3+OcSg3: теневаӈгудась
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: теневаӈгусь
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Mod/prob+Aor+ScDu1+OcDu3: [теневаӈгодакэхэюниʼ, теневаӈгоданакэхэюниʼ]
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Mod/prob+Aor+ScDu1+OcPl3: [теневаӈгодакыниʼ, теневаӈгоданакыниʼ]
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Mod/prob+Aor+ScDu1+OcSg3: [теневаӈгодакэмиʼ, теневаӈгоданакэмиʼ]
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Mod/prob+Aor+ScDu1: [теневаӈгодакэниʼ, теневаӈгоданакэниʼ]
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Mod/prob+Aor+ScDu2+OcDu3: [теневаӈгодакэхэюдиʼ, теневаӈгоданакэхэюдиʼ]
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Mod/prob+Aor+ScDu2+OcPl3: [теневаӈгодакыдиʼ, теневаӈгоданакыдиʼ]
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Mod/prob+Aor+ScDu2+OcSg3: [теневаӈгодакэриʼ, теневаӈгоданакэриʼ]
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Mod/prob+Aor+ScDu2: [теневаӈгодакэдиʼ, теневаӈгоданакэдиʼ]
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Mod/prob+Aor+ScDu3+OcDu3: [теневаӈгодакэхэюдиʼ, теневаӈгоданакэхэюдиʼ]
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Mod/prob+Aor+ScDu3+OcPl3: [теневаӈгодакыдиʼ, теневаӈгоданакыдиʼ]
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Mod/prob+Aor+ScDu3+OcSg3: [теневаӈгодакэдиʼ, теневаӈгоданакэдиʼ]
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Mod/prob+Aor+ScDu3: [теневаӈгодакэхэʼ, теневаӈгоданакэхэʼ]
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Mod/prob+Aor+ScPl1+OcDu3: [теневаӈгодакэхэюнаˮ, теневаӈгоданакэхэюнаˮ]
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Mod/prob+Aor+ScPl1+OcPl3: [теневаӈгодакынаˮ, теневаӈгоданакынаˮ]
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Mod/prob+Aor+ScPl1+OcSg3: [теневаӈгодакэваˮ, теневаӈгоданакэваˮ]
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Mod/prob+Aor+ScPl1: [теневаӈгодакэваˮ, теневаӈгоданакэваˮ]
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Mod/prob+Aor+ScPl2+OcDu3: [теневаӈгодакэхэюдаˮ, теневаӈгоданакэхэюдаˮ]
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Mod/prob+Aor+ScPl2+OcPl3: [теневаӈгодакыдаˮ, теневаӈгоданакыдаˮ]
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Mod/prob+Aor+ScPl2+OcSg3: [теневаӈгодакэраˮ, теневаӈгоданакэраˮ]
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Mod/prob+Aor+ScPl2: [теневаӈгодакэдаˮ, теневаӈгоданакэдаˮ]
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Mod/prob+Aor+ScPl3+OcDu3: [теневаӈгодакэхэюдоʼ, теневаӈгоданакэхэюдоʼ]
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Mod/prob+Aor+ScPl3+OcPl3: [теневаӈгодакыдоʼ, теневаӈгоданакыдоʼ]
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Mod/prob+Aor+ScPl3+OcSg3: [теневаӈгодакэдоʼ, теневаӈгоданакэдоʼ]
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Mod/prob+Aor+ScPl3: [теневаӈгодакыˮ, теневаӈгоданакыˮ]
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Mod/prob+Aor+ScSg1+OcDu3: [теневаӈгодакэхэюн, теневаӈгоданакэхэюн]
